Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1512
Construction Lien Record.

In counties where the book form of recording instruments is used, the register of deeds shall also keep a separate book to be called the Construction Lien Record in which all instruments provided by law for securing construction liens shall be recorded.

Laws 1885, c. 41, § 6, p. 222;

Laws 1887, c. 30, § 8, p. 366;

R.S.1913, § 5627;

C.S.1922, § 4954;

C.S.1929, § 26-1212;

R.S.1943, § 23-1512;

Laws 1984, LB 679, § 8.